Massachusetts, session 194th, H4209.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of chapter 51 of the General
Laws or any other general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any individual aged
16 or 17 years old residing in the town of Sunderland, who is ineligible to vote due to age under
state law, but who is otherwise eligible to vote under state law, may upon application have their
names entered on a list of voters established by the office of the Town Clerk for the town of
Sunderland. Such individuals on the list of voters may vote in any election for local offices and
local ballot questions in accordance with this Act. For the purposes of this Act, "local voters" are
anyone who is eligible to vote pursuant to this Act in a local election or upon a local ballot
question in the town of Sunderland.
SECTION 2. Said office of the Town Clerk shall establish a separate registration list for
local voters who shall fill out an alternative registration form. Upon turning eighteen, each local
of 2

voter shall be taken off the separate list and notified that he or she must register as a regular voter
in accordance with state law, regulations, and guidelines, in order to be eligible to vote. Said
office shall create and print, at the town of Sunderland's expense, the special registration form
needed for the purpose of registering local voters.
SECTION 3. Said office is hereby authorized to promulgate regulations, guidelines and
forms to implement the purpose of this act.
SECTION 4. If a local ballot question appears on a state election ballot, the office of the
Town Clerk shall print a separate ballot for the local ballot question at the expense of the town of
Sunderland.
SECTION 5. The town of Sunderland is hereby authorized to pass ordinances to
implement the purpose of this act.
SECTION 6. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to confer upon local voters the right
to vote for any state or federal office or any state or federal ballot questions.
of 2